District of Columbia statutes.
28-4916

Creation and retention of electronic records and conversion of written records by governmental agencies.

The Mayor shall determine whether, and the extent to which, a governmental agency will create electronic records and convert written records to electronic records. The retention of electronic records shall conform to the requirements and practices established under Chapter 17 of Title 2 of the District of Columbia Official Code.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3502(b), 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 64, 51 DCR 881
June 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-175, § 3, 55 DCR 5387
D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 17-175 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “The Mayor shall determine whether, and the extent to which, a governmental agency will create and retain electronic records and convert written records to electronic records.”
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3202(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (1999 Act).